Illinois, session 104th, HB2525.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Illinois, 3represented in the General Assembly: 4    Section 5. The Illinois Vehicle Code is amended by 5changing Section 11-204 as follows: 6    (625 ILCS 5/11-204)  (from Ch. 95 1/2, par. 11-204)7    Sec. 11-204. Fleeing or attempting to elude a peace 8officer. 9    (a) Any driver or operator of a motor vehicle who, having 10been given a visual or audible signal by a peace officer 11directing such driver or operator to bring his vehicle to a 12stop, wilfully fails or refuses to obey such direction, 13increases his speed, extinguishes his lights, or otherwise 14flees or attempts to elude the officer, is guilty of a Class A 15misdemeanor, except that fleeing or attempting to elude a 16peace officer is a Class 4 felony if there is video evidence of 17the driver or operator of the motor vehicle fleeing or 18attempting to elude the peace officer and that the fleeing or 19attempting to elude the peace officer results in damage to 20property of the State, a unit of local government, or school 21district. The signal given by the peace officer may be by hand, 22voice, siren, red or blue light. Provided, the officer giving 23such signal shall be in police uniform, and, if driving a   HB2525- 2 -LRB104 10679 LNS 20758 b1vehicle, such vehicle shall display illuminated oscillating, 2rotating or flashing red or blue lights which when used in 3conjunction with an audible horn or siren would indicate the 4vehicle to be an official police vehicle. Such requirement 5shall not preclude the use of amber or white oscillating, 6rotating or flashing lights in conjunction with red or blue 7oscillating, rotating or flashing lights as required in 8Section 12-215 of Chapter 12.9    (b) Upon receiving notice of such conviction the Secretary 10of State shall suspend the drivers license of the person so 11convicted for a period of not more than 6 months for a first 12conviction and not more than 12 months for a second 13conviction.14    (c) A third or subsequent violation of this Section is a 15Class 4 felony.16(Source: P.A. 93-120, eff. 1-1-04.)